Hawaii statutes.
[§636C-4] Notice of filing. (a) At
the time of the filing of the foreign judgment, the judgment creditor or the
judgment creditor's lawyer shall make and file with the clerk of court an
affidavit setting forth the name and last known post office address of the
judgment debtor and the judgment creditor.

(b) Promptly upon the filing of the foreign
judgment and the affidavit, the clerk shall mail notice of the filing of the
foreign judgment to the judgment debtor at the address given and shall make a
note of the mailing in the docket. The notice shall include the name and post
office address of the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor's lawyer, if
any, in this State. In addition, the judgment creditor may mail a notice of
the filing of the judgment to the judgment debtor and may file proof of mailing
with the clerk. The failure by the clerk to mail notice of filing shall not
affect the enforcement proceedings if proof of mailing by the judgment creditor
has been filed. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next